Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1658.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be


codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:


A. This act shall be known and may be cited as the “Informed


Consent and Medical Transparency Act”.


B. The Legislature declares that informed consent is a


cornerstone of ethical medical practice and falls within the


traditional authority of the State of Oklahoma to protect the


health, safety, and welfare of its citizens. Nothing in this act


shall be construed to alter or conflict with federal drug approval


or labeling requirements; rather, it establishes independent state



Req. No. 2346 Page 1


duties of disclosure and transparency to ensure Oklahomans can make


informed medical decisions.


SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 355.5 of Title 59, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. 1. Each manufacturer of a drug, vaccine, or biologic


distributed in this state shall prepare a plain-language summary of


known or reasonably suspected side effects or adverse events that


are material to informed consent, including those that are rare but


serious or life-threatening.


2. The summary shall be written in a manner understandable to


health care providers and patients and shall be updated whenever the


manufacturer, in the exercise of reasonable care, becomes aware of


new or credible safety information that would materially affect


informed consent.


3. Manufacturers shall provide the current summary to the State


Board of Pharmacy for publication on a public website and to


hospitals, pharmacies, and licensed prescribers within this state.


4. Nothing in this subsection shall require alteration of


federally approved labeling or submission of data to any federal


agency.


B. 1. Hospitals, health care facilities, and licensed health


care providers shall ensure that each patient, or the patient’s



Req. No. 2346 Page 2


legal guardian, receives the manufacturer’s current summary prior to


administration or prescription of any drug, vaccine, or biologic.


2. Suspected adverse events or side effects shall be documented


through existing electronic medical record systems and transmitted


to the State Board of Pharmacy within ten (10) business days.


3. Any hospital or health care provider that discourages,


obstructs, or retaliates against an employee for good-faith


documentation or reporting of such an event shall be jointly and


severally liable for injuries proximately caused by the suppression


or failure to report.


C. 1. A manufacturer, hospital, or provider that negligently


fails to comply with this section shall be liable for damages


proximately caused by the resulting lack of informed consent.


2. Any patient injured as a result of noncompliance may bring a


civil action for damages, including reasonable attorney fees.


3. Discovery in such actions shall be liberally construed in


favor of transparency, including access to relevant safety data,


communications, and adverse-event documentation.


4. The Attorney General or any district attorney may also bring


an action under the Oklahoma Consumer Protection Act for patterns of


noncompliance.


D. This section shall be liberally construed to promote


transparency and informed decision-making. It shall not be



Req. No. 2346 Page 3


interpreted to mandate or prohibit any treatment or to impose


requirements preempted by federal law.


SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-2346 DC 1/13/2026 9:16:46 PM







































Req. No. 2346 Page 4